Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 16. Public Indebtedness
§ 8. Endorsements required on bonds and other evidences of indebtedness.

No bond or evidence of indebtedness of the state shall be valid unless the same shall have endorsed thereon a certificate signed by the auditor and secretary of state that the bond or evidence of debt is issued pursuant to law and is within the debt limit. No bond or evidence of debt of any county, or bond of any township or other political subdivision, shall be valid unless the same [shall] have endorsed thereon a certificate signed by the county auditor or other officer authorized by law to sign such certificate, stating that said bond or evidence of debt is issued pursuant to law and is within the debt limit.

Constitution does not define “political subdivision.”

Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

But its concept of such entity is different from that of legislature. —

A political subdivision as visualized by the legislature is entirely different from a political subdivision as envisioned by the authors of the Wyoming constitution. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

Political subdivision is unit of local government,

not state government. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

And must be same kind of entity as county, city, etc. —

A “political subdivision” must be an entity of the same kind or class as a county, city, township, town or school district. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

Industrial Development Projects Act held constitutional. —

See Reed v. Cheyenne, 429 P.2d 69,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1967); Powers v. Cheyenne, 435 P.2d 448,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1967), reh'g denied, 436 P.2d 961,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1968).

Cited

in

Diefenderfer v. State ex rel. First Nat'l Bank, 13 Wyo. 387, 80 P. 667,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(1905).

§ 9. Construction and improvement of public roads and highways.

The provision of section 6 of article 16 of this constitution prohibiting the state from engaging in any work of internal improvement unless authorized by a two-thirds vote of the people shall not apply to or affect the construction or improvement of public roads and highways; but the legislature shall have power to provide for the construction and improvement of public roads and highways in whole or in part by the state, either directly or by extending aid to counties; and, notwithstanding said inhibition as to works of internal improvement, whenever grants of land or other property shall have been made to the state, especially dedicated by the grant to particular works of internal improvement, the state may carry on such particular works and shall devote thereto the avails of such grants, and may pledge or appropriate the revenues derived from such works in the aid of their completion. (As added by Laws 1915, House Joint Resolution No. 4, p. 266.)

Cross references. —

For provisions relative to highways generally, see title 24.

Suit not within jurisdiction of federal courts. —

A suit by a Utah contractor against the Wyoming state highway commission is not within the jurisdiction of the federal courts on the grounds of diversity of citizenship since the suit is, in effect, against the state which cannot be treated as a citizen. State Highway Com. v. Utah Constr. Co., 278 U.S. 194, 49 S. Ct. 104, 73 L. Ed. 262, 1929 U.S. LEXIS 6 (U.S. 1929).

§ 10. Construction and improvement of works for conservation and utilization of water.

The provisions of section 6 of article 16 of this constitution prohibiting the state from engaging in any work of internal improvements, unless authorized by a two-thirds vote of the people, shall not apply to or affect the construction or improvement of any works designed, constructed or operated for the purposes of conservation or utilization of water, but the legislature shall have the power to provide for the construction or improvement in whole or in part, of any works designed, constructed or operated for the purposes of conservation or utilization of water, either directly or by extending aid to legal subdivisions of the State of Wyoming, duly organized irrigation, drainage, soil conservation, and public irrigation and power districts, and any public corporation legally organized for the purposes of the conservation, distribution or utilization of water or soil; and notwithstanding said inhibition as to works of internal improvement, whenever grants of land or other property shall be made to the state, especially dedicated by the grant to particular works of internal improvement, the state may carry on such particular works of internal improvement and shall devote thereto the avails of such grants, and may likewise pledge or appropriate the revenues derived from such works in aid of their completion. (As added by Laws 1939, Senate Joint Resolution No. 3, p. 254.)

Cross references. —

As to soil conservation, see §§

11-16-101

to

11-16-134

.

As to water distribution and utilization generally, see title 41.

§ 11. Construction, maintenance and improvement of public airports, aircraft landing strips and related facilities.

The provisions of section 6 of article XVI of this constitution prohibiting the state from engaging in any work of internal improvement unless authorized by a two-thirds vote of the people, shall not apply to or affect the construction, maintenance or improvement of public airports, aircraft landing strips and related facilities but the legislature shall have power to provide for the construction, maintenance and improvement of public airports, aircraft landing strips and related facilities, in whole or in part by the state, either directly or by extending aid to its political subdivisions and, notwithstanding said inhibition as to works of internal improvement, whenever grants of land or other property shall have been made to the state, especially dedicated by the grant to particular works of internal improvement, the state may carry on such particular works and shall devote thereto the avails of such grants, and may pledge or appropriate the revenues derived from such works in the aid of their completion and maintenance. (As added by Laws 1947, House Joint Resolution No. 8, p. 257.)

Cross references. —

As to municipal and county airports, see §§

10-5-101

through

10-5-302

.

As to authority of board of commissioners of county to acquire property for airports, see §§

18-9-101

to

18-9-202

.

Constitution does not define “political subdivision.”

Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

But its concept of such entity is different from that of legislature. —

A political subdivision as visualized by the legislature is entirely different from a political subdivision as envisioned by the authors of the Wyoming constitution. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

Political subdivision is unit of local government,

not state government. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

And must be same kind of entity as county, city, etc. —

A “political subdivision” must be an entity of the same kind or class as a county, city, township, town or school district. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

Cited

in

Geringer v. Bebout, 10 P.3d 514,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 2000).

§ 12. Economic development loan fund.

Notwithstanding Article 3, Section 36 and Article 16, Sections 1, 2 and 6 of this Constitution, the legislature, by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of all the members of each of the two (2) houses voting separately, may appropriate monies in an amount not exceeding one percent (1%) times the assessed value of the taxable property in the state as shown by the last preceding general assessment for taxation, to provide a revolving investment fund to be used to promote and aid the economic development of the state.

The investment fund created by this section shall be used to provide fully-funded loan guarantees or loans to proposed or existing enterprises which will employ people within the state, provide services within the state, use resources within the state or otherwise add economic value to goods, services or resources within the state.

Monies within the revolving investment fund shall be loaned or used to guarantee loans under such terms and conditions as the legislature may by law direct.

The cumulative total of monies appropriated to provide a revolving investment fund shall never exceed one percent (1%) on the assessed value of the taxable property in the state as shown by the last preceding general assessment for taxation.

Notwithstanding the limitation of subsection (d) of this section, earnings on the revolving investment fund shall be added to the revolving investment fund and shall be invested as provided in this section. (As added by Laws 1986, House Joint Resolution No. 1, p. 292.)

§ 13. Industrial and economic development; powers of counties and municipalities.

Notwithstanding any other provision in this constitution, the legislature may authorize counties or incorporated municipalities, to appropriate from local sources of revenue such funds as may be deemed necessary for an economic or industrial development project or program, public or private, subject to approval by a vote of the majority of the registered voters of the county or municipality voting upon the question. For purposes of this section, “funds from local sources of revenue” means funds raised from general taxes levied by the county or municipality and shall not include any funds received by the county or municipality which are derived from state or federal sources. (As added by Laws 2004, House Enrolled Joint Resolution No. 1.)

Enactments. —

Laws 2004, House Enrolled Joint Resolution No. 1, § 1 authorized the submission of a proposed enactment of a section, which was approved by vote of the people at the general election held November 2, 2004, and certified November 10, 2004.

The section authorizes the legislature to enact laws for local governments to use local sources of revenue for economic or industrial development subject to approval of the voters.